Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.685

Lease covenants, conditions, and terms to be developed—Applicability.

The director shall develop lease covenants, conditions, and terms which:

(1) Obligate the lessor to conduct or have conducted a walk-through survey of the leased premises;

(2) Obligate the lessor to implement identified energy conservation maintenance and operating procedures upon completion of the walk-through survey; and

(3) Obligate the lessor to undertake technical assistance studies and subsequent acquisition and installation of energy conservation measures if the director, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, determines that these studies and measures will both conserve energy and can be accomplished with a state funding contribution limited to the savings which would result in utility expenses during the term of the lease.

These lease covenants, conditions, and terms shall be incorporated into all specified new, renewed, and renegotiated leases executed on or after January 1, 1983. This section applies to all leases under which state occupancy is at least half of the facility space and includes an area greater than three thousand square feet.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 239; 1982 c 48 s 4; 1980 c 172 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.